nl: Tafeltennis wedstrijdbal certificering: ITTF-goedgekeurd; Nationaal goedgekeurd; Niet gecertificeerd; Oefening/training (niet-goedgekeurd); WTT-goedgekeurd; Overig
pt-PT: certificação de competição de Ping: Aprovada pela ITTF; Aprovada a nível nacional; Sem certificação; Prática/treino (não aprovada); Aprovada pela WTT; Outra
hr-HR: Certifikat za natjecanje Ping -pongu: Odobrio ITTF; Odobreno na nacionalnoj razini; Nije certificirano; Praksa/trening (nije odobreno); Odobrio WTT; Ostalo
sv: Bordtennistävlingscertifiering: ITTF-godkänd; Godkänd på nationell nivå; Inte certifierad; Övning/träning (ej godkänd); WTT-godkänd; Övrigt
pt-BR: Pingue-pongue competição certificação: Aprovado pela ITTF; Aprovado em nível nacional; Não certificado; Prática/treinamento (não aprovado); Aprovado pela WTT; Outros
sk-SK: Súťažná certifikácia stolného tenisu: Schválené ITTF; Schválené na národnej úrovni; Bez certifikácie; Cvičné/tréningové (neschválené); Schválené WTT; Iné
th: ใบรับรองการแข่งขันปิงปอง: ได้รับการรับรองจาก ITTF; ได้รับการรับรองระดับชาติ; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; สำหรับฝึกซ้อม/เทรนนิง (ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง); ได้รับการรับรองจาก WTT; อื่นๆ
nb: Konkurransesertifisering for bordtennis: ITTF-godkjent; Godkjent på nasjonalt nivå; Ikke sertifisert; Øvelse/trening (ikke godkjent); WTT-godkjent; Annet
de: Wettkampf-Zertifizierung für Tischtennis: ITTF-zertifiziert; Zertifizierung auf nationaler Ebene; Nicht zertifiziert; Übung/Training (nicht zertifiziert); WTT-zertifiziert; Andere
ro-RO: Certificare competiție Ping -pong: Aprobat de ITTF; Aprobat la nivel național; Necertificat; Antrenament/practică (neaprobat); Aprobat de WTT; Altele
fi: Pöytätenniksen kilpailusertifikaatti: ITTF-hyväksytty; Kansallisen tason hyväksyntä; Ei sertifioitu; Harjoittelu/treeni (ei hyväksytty); WTT-hyväksytty; Muu
da: Bordtennis-konkurrencecertificering: Godkendt af ITTF; Godkendt på nationalt niveau; Ikke certificeret; Træning (ikke-godkendt); Godkendt af WTT; Andet
ru: Сертификация для соревнований по настольному теннису: Одобрено ITTF; Одобрено на национальном уровне; Не сертифицировано; Для практики/тренировок (не одобрено); Одобрено WTT; Другое
lt-LT: Stalo teniso varžybų sertifikavimas: Patvirtinta ITTF; Patvirtinta nacionaliniu lygiu; Nesertifikuota; Praktikai / treniruotėms (nepatvirtinta); Patvirtinta WTT; Kita
zh-CN: 乒乓球比赛认证: ITTF 认证; 国家级认证; 未认证; 练习/训练（非认证）; WTT 认证; 其他
ja: 卓球競技会認定証: ITTF公認; 国内競技団体公認; 非公認; 練習/トレーニング用 (非公認); WTT公認; その他
bg-BG: Сертификация за състезания по пинг-понг: Одобрено от ITTF; Одобрено на национално ниво; Без сертификат; За тренировки/практика (неодобрено); Одобрено от WTT; Друго
it: Certificazione da competizione ping pong: Approvato ITTF; Approvato a livello nazionale; Non certificato; Pratica/allenamento (non approvato); Approvato WTT; Altro
el: Πιστοποίηση διαγωνισμού πινγκ-πονγκ: Εγκεκριμένο από την ITTF; Εγκεκριμένο σε εθνικό επίπεδο; Χωρίς πιστοποίηση; Εξάσκηση/προπόνηση (μη εγκεκριμένο); Εγκεκριμένο από την WTT; Άλλο
en: Ping pong competition certification: ITTF approved; National-level approved; Not certified; Practice/training (non-approved); WTT approved; Other
vi: Chứng chỉ thi đấu bóng bàn: Được ITTF phê duyệt; Được phê duyệt cấp quốc gia; Không được chứng nhận; Tập luyện (không được phê duyệt); Được WTT phê duyệt; Khác
zh-TW: 桌球比賽認證: ITTF 認證; 國家級認證; 未認證; 練習/訓練用 (未認證); WTT 認證; 其他
es: Certificación para competiciones de ping pong: Aprobada por la ITTF; Aprobada a nivel nacional; No certificada; Práctica/entrenamiento (no aprobada); Aprobada por WTT; Otra
fr: Homologation de compétition de ping-pong: Approuvé par l’ITTF; Approuvé au niveau national; Non certifié; Pratique/entraînement (non approuvé); Approuvé par le WTT; Autre
ko: 탁구 대회 인증: ITTF 공인; 국가 수준 공인; 미인증; 연습/훈련용(미공인); WTT 공인; 기타
sl-SI: Tekmovalni certifikat za namizni tenis: Odobreno pri ITTF; Odobreno na državni ravni; Ni certificirano; Za vajo/trening (ni odobreno); Odobreno pri WTT; Drugo
hu: Asztalitenisz-versenyminősítés: ITTF által jóváhagyott; Országos szinten jóváhagyott; Nem tanúsított; Gyakorló/edző (nem jóváhagyott); WTT által jóváhagyott; Egyéb
cs: Certifikace ping pongu pro soutěže: Schváleno ITTF; Schváleno na národní úrovni; Nezertifikováno; Cvičné/tréninkové (neschváleno); Schváleno WTT; Ostatní
tr: Masa tenisi müsabaka sertifikası: ITTF onaylı; Ulusal düzeyde onaylı; Sertifikasız; Antrenman/eğitim (onaysız); WTT onaylı; Diğer
pl: Certyfikacja turniejowa ping-ponga: Zatwierdzone przez ITTF; Zatwierdzone na poziomie krajowym; Brak certyfikatu; Treningowa (niezatwierdzona); Zatwierdzona przez WTT; Inna